Vermont statutes. Title 16 Education
Subchapter 1. General Provisions

§§ 141-144.
Repealed.
1969, No. 298 (Adj. Sess.), § 79.

§ 144a.
Repealed. 2011, No. 58, § 31, eff. May 31, 2011.

§ 144b.
Redesignated. 2013, No. 92 (Adj. Sess.), § 19, eff. Feb. 14, 2014.

§ 145.
Repealed.
1961, No. 247, § 4.

§§ 146-151.
Repealed.
1969, No. 298 (Adj. Sess.), § 79.

§ 161.
State Board of Education; appointment of members; term; vacancy.

The State Board shall consist of ten members. Two of the members shall be secondary students, one of whom shall be a full member and the other of whom shall be a junior member who may not vote. All members shall be appointed by the Governor with the advice and consent of the Senate. In the appointment of the nonstudent members, priority shall be given to the selection of persons with a demonstrated commitment to ensuring quality education for Vermont students. To the extent possible, the members shall represent the State’s geographic, gender, racial, and ethnic diversity. The Secretary shall serve on the State Board as a nonvoting member.

Upon the expiration of the respective terms of those members of the Board previously appointed, excluding the student members, the Governor shall, biennially in the month of February with the advice and consent of the Senate, appoint members for terms of six years. The terms shall begin March 1 of the year in which the appointments are made. A member serving a term of six years shall not be eligible for reappointment for successive terms.

In the event of any vacancy occurring in the membership of the Board, the Governor shall fill the vacancy with a qualified person whose appointment shall be for the unexpired portion of the term.

Biennially, the Board shall choose a member of the Board to be its chair.

Annually, using an application process that is open and accessible to all eligible students, the Governor shall appoint a Vermont secondary school student who will continue to be a secondary student for at least two years following taking office, to serve on the State Board for two years, beginning on July 1 of the year of appointment. The student member shall not vote during the first year and shall be a full and voting member during the second year of his or her term.

HISTORY:

Added

1969, No. 298

(Adj. Sess.), § 12; amended

1975, No. 48

, § 2, eff. date, at end of chair’s term;

1997, No. 34

, § 1;

1999, No. 74

(Adj. Sess.), § 1, eff. March 27, 2000;

2011, No. 98

(Adj. Sess.), § 2, eff. Jan. 1, 2013;

2019, No. 131

(Adj. Sess.), § 52;

2021, No. 66

, § 19, eff. June 7, 2021.

§ 162.
Removal of Board members.

After notice and hearing, the Governor may remove a member of the State Board for incompetency, failure to discharge his or her duties, malfeasance, illegal acts, or other cause inimical to the welfare of the public schools; and in case of such removal, he or she shall appoint a person to fill the unexpired term.

HISTORY:

Added

1969, No. 298

(Adj. Sess.), § 13.

§ 163.
Staff; meetings.

The Board shall be supported by adequate staff, who shall report to the Board.

The Board shall meet monthly and shall hold special meetings as required for the performance of its duties. The times and places for regular and special meetings shall be designated by the Chair of the Board. The Chair shall call a special meeting upon the written request of any two members.

HISTORY:

Added

1969, No. 298

(Adj. Sess.), § 14; amended

2011, No. 98

(Adj. Sess.), § 3, eff. April 1, 2013.

§ 164.
State Board; general powers and duties.

The State Board shall engage local school board members and the broader education community and, consistent with the provisions of this title, its own rules, and rules adopted by the Secretary, establish and regularly update a long-term strategic vision for the delivery of educational services in Vermont; advise the General Assembly, the Governor, and the Secretary of Education on high-priority educational policies and issues as they arise; and act in accordance with legislative mandates, including the adoption of rules and executing special assignments. In addition to other specified duties, the Board shall:

Establish such advisory commissions as in the judgment of the Board will be of assistance to it in carrying out its duties. Advisory commission members shall serve with or without compensation at the discretion of the Board but shall receive actual expenses incurred in pursuance of their duties.

Have the authority to enter into agreements with school districts, municipalities, states, the United States, foundations, agencies, or individuals for service, educational programs, or research projects.

Examine and determine all appeals that by law are made to it and prescribe rules of practice in respect thereto, not inconsistent with law.

[Repealed.]

[Repealed.]

Make regulations governing the attendance and records of attendance of all students and the deportment of students attending public schools.

Adopt rules pursuant to 3 V.S.A. chapter 25 to carry out the powers and duties of the Board as directed by the General Assembly, within the limitations of legislative intent.

[Repealed.]

Implement and continually update standards for student performance in appropriate content areas and at appropriate intervals in the continuum from kindergarten to grade 12 and methods of assessment to determine attainment of the standards for student performance. The standards shall be rigorous, challenging, and designed to prepare students to participate in and contribute to the democratic process and to compete in the global marketplace. The standards shall include a standard for reading level proficiency for students completing grade three.

[Repealed.]

If deemed advisable, determine educational standards for admission to and graduation from the public schools.

[Repealed.]

Be the State Board for the program of adult education and literacy and perform all the duties and powers prescribed by law pertaining to adult education and literacy and to act as the State approval agency for educational institutions conducting programs of adult education and literacy.

Adopt rules for approval of independent schools.

Establish criteria governing the establishment of a system for the receipt, deposit, accounting, and disbursement of all funds by supervisory unions and school districts.

In cooperation with the Secretary, ensure that the Agency develops information, plans, and assistance to aid in making technology and telecommunications available and coordinated in all school districts. The State Board shall develop guidelines for distribution of federal, State, or private funds designated for the development or expansion of distance learning technologies. The guidelines shall encourage, consistent with any terms or conditions established by the funding source, collaboration between schools and school districts to realize economic and educational efficiencies.

Report annually on the condition of education statewide and on a supervisory union and school district basis. The report shall include information on attainment of standards for student performance adopted under subdivision (9) of this section, number and types of complaints of hazing, harassment, or bullying made pursuant to chapter 9, subchapter 5 of this title and responses to the complaints, financial resources and expenditures, and community social indicators. The report shall be organized and presented in a way that is easily understandable by the general public and that enables each school, school district, and supervisory union to determine its strengths and weaknesses. To the extent consistent with State and federal privacy laws and regulations, data on hazing, harassment, or bullying incidents shall be disaggregated by incident type, including disaggregation by ethnic groups, racial groups, religious groups, gender, sexual orientation, gender identity, disability status, and English language learner status. The Secretary shall use the information in the report to determine whether students in each school, school district, and supervisory union are provided educational opportunities substantially equal to those provided in other schools, school districts, and supervisory unions pursuant to subsection 165(b) of this title.

Ensure that Vermont’s students, including students enrolled in secondary career technical education, have access to a substantially equal educational opportunity by developing a system to evaluate the equalizing effects of Vermont’s education finance system and education quality standards under section 165 of this title.

[Repealed.]

Pursuant to section 806g of this title, constitute the State Council for the Interstate Compact on Educational Opportunity for Military Children and appoint to the Council a Compact Commissioner and Military Family Education Liaison, who may be the same person. The Board may appoint additional members.

Report annually to the Governor and the General Assembly on the progress the Board has made on the development of education policy for the State.

HISTORY:

Added

1969, No. 298

(Adj. Sess.), § 15; amended

1971, No. 14

, § 5, eff. March 11, 1971;

1975, No. 48

, §§ 3, 14, eff. April 15, 1975;

1975, No. 147

(Adj. Sess.), § 3;

1981, No. 151

(Adj. Sess.), § 5;

1983, No. 247

(Adj. Sess.), § 4(1);

1983, No. 248

(Adj. Sess.), § 4;

1987, No. 97

, § 4, eff. June 23, 1987;

1987, No. 228

(Adj. Sess.), § 6;

1989, No. 118

, § 3;

1991, No. 24

, § 11;

1991, No. 204

(Adj. Sess.), § 7;

1997, No. 60

, § 3, eff. June 26, 1997;

1997, No. 138

(Adj. Sess.), § 3, eff. April 27, 1998;

1999, No. 113

(Adj. Sess.), § 1a;

1999, No. 120

(Adj. Sess.), § 3;

2001, No. 151

(Adj. Sess.), § 50, eff. July 1, 2003;

2005, No. 214

(Adj. Sess.), § 12;

2007, No. 154

(Adj. Sess.), § 6;

2011, No. 43

, § 2, eff. July 1, 2011;

2011, No. 45

, § 7a, eff. May 24, 2011;

2011, No. 98

(Adj. Sess.), § 4, eff. April 1, 2013;

2013, No. 56

, § 22, eff. May 30, 2013;

2013, No. 92

(Adj. Sess.), §§ 8, 9, 302, eff. Feb. 14, 2014;

2013, No. 142

(Adj. Sess.), § 26;

2015, No. 23

, § 18;

2015, No. 131

(Adj. Sess.), § 23;

2019, No. 1

, § 2, eff. Mar. 29, 2019;

2019, No. 1

31 (Adj. Sess.), § 53;

2021, No. 66

, § 20, eff. June 7, 2021.

§ 164a.
Statewide Strategic Education Plan.

Beginning on July 1, 1998, the State Board shall adopt through a public process a statewide strategic education plan to describe how the Agency will help school boards to improve student performance. The State Board shall update and readopt the plan at least every five years. The goals of the plan shall be to strengthen coherence and consistency among State and local education goals, standards for student performance, assessments, professional development opportunities, and action plans and to provide support for local curriculum development. The plan shall include information as to the economic costs of implementation and the education benefits to be derived.

HISTORY:

Added

1997, No. 60

, § 6, eff. June 26, 1997;

2013, No. 92

(Adj. Sess.), §§ 10, 11, eff. Feb. 14, 2014.

§ 165.
Education quality standards; equal educational opportunities; independent school meeting education quality standards.

In order to carry out Vermont’s policy that all Vermont children will be afforded educational opportunities that are substantially equal in quality, each Vermont public school, including each career technical center, shall meet the following education quality standards:

The school, through a process including parents, teachers, students, and community members, develops, implements, and annually updates a continuous improvement plan to improve student performance within the school. The plan shall include goals and objectives for improved student learning and educational strategies and activities to achieve its goals. The plan shall also address the effectiveness of efforts made since the previous continuous improvement plan to ensure the school maintains a safe, orderly, civil, and positive learning environment that is free from harassment, hazing, and bullying. The school shall assess student performance under the plan using a method or methods of assessment developed under subdivision 164(9) of this title.

The school, at least annually, reports student performance results to community members in a format selected by the school board. In the case of a regional career technical center, the community means the school districts in the service region. The school report shall include:

Information indicating progress toward meeting standards from the most recent measure taken.

[Repealed.]

Information indicating progress toward meeting the goals of an annual continuous improvement plan.

Any other statistical information about the school or community that the school board deems necessary to place student performance results in context.

-(G) [Repealed.]

(H)

A description of how the school ensures that each student receives appropriate career counseling and program information regarding availability of education and apprenticeship program offerings at career technical centers.

The school substantially meets standards adopted by rule of the State Board regarding conditions, practices and resources of schools. The standards shall address those aspects of the following that are most closely associated with improving student performance:

school leadership, staffing, and support services;

instructional practices and curriculum leadership, content, and coordination;

educational materials and school facilities;

access to current technology.

The school shall provide for and the staff shall use needs-based professional development designed to improve the quality of education provided to the students and directly connected to standards for student performance established by the State Board and any other educational performance goals established by the school board.

The school uses staff evaluation to advance educational performance objectives.

The school ensures that students receive appropriate career counseling and program information regarding the availability of education and apprenticeship program offerings at career technical centers. In addition, the school, if it is a secondary school, offers a genuine opportunity to access career technical education programs.

The school ensures that students are furnished educational services in accordance with any State or federal entitlements and in a nondiscriminatory manner.

The school maintains a safe, orderly, civil, and positive learning environment that is free from hazing, harassment, and bullying, and is based on sound instructional and classroom management practices and clear discipline policies that are consistently and effectively enforced.

Annually, the Secretary shall determine whether students in each Vermont public school are provided educational opportunities substantially equal to those provided in other public schools. If the Secretary determines that a school is not meeting the education quality standards listed in subsection (a) of this section or that the school is making insufficient progress in improving student performance in relation to the standards for student performance set forth in subdivision 164(9) of this title, he or she shall describe in writing actions that a district must take in order to meet either or both sets of standards and shall provide technical assistance to the school. If the school fails to meet the standards or make sufficient progress within two years of the determination, the Secretary shall recommend to the State Board one or more of the following actions:

the Agency continue to provide technical assistance for one more cycle of review;

the State Board adjust supervisory union boundaries or responsibilities of the superintendency pursuant to section 261 of this title;

the Secretary assume administrative control of an individual school, school district, or supervisory union, including budgetary control to ensure sound financial practices, only to the extent necessary to correct deficiencies;

the State Board close an individual school or schools and require that the school district pay tuition to another public school or an approved independent school pursuant to chapter 21 of this title; or

the State Board require two or more school districts to consolidate their governance structures.

The State Board, after offering the school board an opportunity for a hearing, shall either dismiss the Secretary’s recommendation or order that one or more of the actions listed in subsection (b) of this section be taken. The action ordered by the State Board shall be the least intrusive consistent with the need to provide students attending the school substantially equal educational opportunities. A school board aggrieved by an order of the State Board may appeal the order in accordance with the Rules of Civil Procedure.

Nothing in this section shall be construed to entitle any student to educational programs or services identical to those received by students in the same or any other school district. Further, nothing in this section shall create a private right of action.

If the Secretary determines at any time that the failure of a school to meet the education quality standards listed in subsection (a) of this section is severe or pervasive, potentially results in physical or emotional harm to students, or significant deprivation of equal education opportunities, and the school has either unreasonably refused to remedy the problem or its efforts have proved ineffective, he or she may recommend to the State Board one or more of the actions listed in subsection (b) of this section. The State Board shall then follow the procedure of subsection (c) of this section.

In order to be designated an independent school meeting education quality standards, an independent school shall participate in the education quality standards process of subsection (b) of this section. An independent school shall receive technical assistance in accordance with the provisions of subsection (b), but shall not be subject to subdivisions (b)(2)-(4) of this section. The school shall be an independent school meeting education quality standards unless the State Board, after opportunity for hearing, finds that:

the school has discontinued its participation in the education quality standards process; or

two or more years following a determination that the school is not meeting the education quality standards or that the school is making insufficient progress in improving student performance, the school fails to meet the standards or make sufficient progress toward meeting the standards.

HISTORY:

Added

1969, No. 298

(Adj. Sess.), § 16; amended

1981, No. 151

(Adj. Sess.), § 6;

1987, No. 97

, § 5, eff. June 23, 1987;

1989, No. 44

, § 3, eff. June 1, 1990;

1997, No. 60

, § 4, eff. July 1, 1998;

1997, No. 71

(Adj. Sess.), § 82, eff. March 11, 1998;

1997, No. 138

(Adj. Sess.), § 4, eff. April 27, 1998;

1999, No. 113

(Adj. Sess.), § 1b;

1999, No. 120

(Adj. Sess.), § 4;

2001, No. 8

, § 2;

2003, No. 68

, § 46, eff. June 18, 2003;

2005, No. 54

, § 1;

2007, No. 154

(Adj. Sess.), § 7;

2013, No. 92

(Adj. Sess.), § 12, eff. Feb. 14, 2014;

2013, No. 142

(Adj. Sess.), § 27;

2015, No. 23

, § 19;

2015, No. 46

, § 40, eff. July 1, 2020;

2015, No. 131

(Adj. Sess.), § 24;

2017, No. 49

, § 26, eff. May 23, 2017.

§ 165a.
Repealed. 1989, No. 44, § 7, eff. July 1, 1990.